Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 2 Division of Motor Vehicles

31-2-1.
Establishment — Duties — Chief of division.

Within the department of revenue there shall be a division of motor vehicles. The division will be responsible for activities assigned to it by law, including, but not limited to, motor vehicle registration, testing and licensing of motor vehicle operators, inspection of motor vehicles, and enforcement of laws relating to the issuance, suspension and revocation of motor vehicle registrations and drivers’ licenses. The division shall administer the financial responsibility law. The chief of the division shall use the title and designation “registrar” or “administrator” on all licenses, registrations, orders of suspensions, financial responsibility notices or orders, or any other official documents issued or promulgated by the division. He or she shall exercise all powers and duties prescribed by chapters 1 — 27 of this title and shall supervise and direct the promotion of highway traffic safety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 22; P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-1

; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 77; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 38, § 4.

31-2-2.
Subordinates and investigators.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall appoint any subordinates that he or she may require for the proper performance of his or her duties. He or she shall appoint investigators who shall be empowered to investigate the application for any motor vehicle license or registration in order to ascertain the truth of the statements made in it, to seize or recover the license or registration certificate and number plates of any person whose license or registration shall have been suspended or revoked, and to perform any other duties not inconsistent with the law as the administrator may direct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 23; P.L. 1939, ch. 678, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-2

.

31-2-3.
Enforcement duties of administrator.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is vested with the power and is charged with the duty of observing, administering, and enforcing the provisions of chapters 1 — 50 of this title and of all laws regulating the operation of vehicles, or the use of the highways, the enforcement or administration of which is now or hereafter vested in the division of motor vehicles.

The administrator shall appoint any subordinates he or she may require for the proper performance of his or her duties. The administrator, and any subordinates designated by the administrator, shall have and exercise throughout this state the same authority to make arrests for violations of statutes relating to motor vehicles and to enforce those statutes as police or town constables have in their respective jurisdictions, including the power of arrest without warrant for any violation of title 31. The administrator, and any subordinates designated by the administrator, may serve all process lawfully issued by the administrator. Whenever a complaint is made of any violation of the provisions of the aforementioned chapters by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, or those subordinates designated by him or her to enforce these provisions, he or she shall not be required to furnish surety for cost or be liable for cost upon any complaint. The administrator, and any subordinates he or she may designate, may bear and use firearms and may be equipped with uniforms as prescribed by the administrator of motor vehicles in accordance with the policing and enforcing provisions as prescribed by this section.

The administrator may provide for training for those persons designated with authority to make arrests and shall issue to each such person credentials showing his or her identity and these credentials shall be carried upon their person while in the discharge of his or her duties.

At no time may any subordinate authorized to make arrests stop a motorist for any violation of the motor vehicle law while the motorist is operating a vehicle upon any highway of this state, unless that subordinate is operating or riding in a division of motor vehicles vehicle that is plainly marked “Division of motor vehicles” or unless the motorist is fleeing from pursuit by a division of motor vehicles officer.

The administrator may adopt any further regulations that he or she may deem necessary to implement this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-3

; P.L. 1975, ch. 121, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 32; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 32.

31-2-4.
Rules and regulations — Exception to authority.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles, department of revenue is authorized to adopt and enforce those rules and regulations that may be necessary to carry out the provisions of chapters 1 — 27 of this title, and any other laws the enforcement and administration of which are vested in the division of motor vehicles, including rules and regulations concerning specialized testing and standards for operators of commercial vehicles; provided, however, that nothing contained in this section shall be construed to authorize the administrator to charge any monetary fee for a license or permit to utilize a flashing light by any volunteer fire department or volunteer ambulance squad.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-4

; P.L. 1979, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 3.

31-2-5.
Official seal.

The administrator may adopt an official seal for the use of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-5

.

31-2-6.
Offices.

The administrator shall maintain offices in those places in the state that he or she may deem necessary to properly carry out the powers and duties vested in the division of motor vehicles. The administrator shall provide direct, in-person services in the towns of Warren and Westerly and keep the services in Warren available for business at least three (3) days per week and keep the services in Westerly available at least one day per week.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-6

; P.L. 1976, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 37, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 11, effective June 27, 2022.

31-2-7.
Forms.

The administrator shall prescribe and provide suitable forms of applications, registration cards, operators’ and chauffeurs’ licenses, and all other forms requisite or deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of chapters 1 — 50 of this title and any other laws, the enforcement and administration of which are vested in the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-7

.

31-2-8.
Oaths and acknowledgments.

Officers and employees of the division of motor vehicles designated by the administrator are, for the purpose of administering the motor vehicle laws, authorized to administer oaths and acknowledge signatures, and shall do so without fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-8

.

31-2-9.
Certified copies of licenses, applications and certificates.

The administrator and any officers of the division of motor vehicles that he or she may designate are authorized to prepare under the seal of the division of motor vehicles and deliver upon request a certified copy of the application for operator’s license or registration, or operator’s license or registration, charging a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each document so authenticated, and every such certified copy shall be admissible in any proceeding in any court in like manner as the original.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-9

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 4, § 1.

31-2-10.
Abstracts of operator’s records.

The administrator shall upon request furnish a certified abstract of the record of any operator on file fully designating the motor vehicles, if any, registered in the name of the operator, the record of all convictions of the operator of any of the provisions of this title, and the record of all the operator’s involvements in accidents required to be reported under the provisions of §

31-33-1

. If the operator has no such record, the administrator shall so certify. The administrator shall collect for each certificate the sum of sixteen dollars ($16.00); however, if the request for the certificate is made by any governmental agency, bureau, or department for use in its official capacity, the administrator shall collect no fee. The requirement of this section that the certificate shall be furnished shall not make the certificate admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding or in any trial, whether criminal or civil.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-10

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 3; P.L. 1960, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 2, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 8; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 85, § 7; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 10, § 1.

31-2-11.
Records open for inspection — Admissibility of certified copies of records as evidence.

All records of the division of motor vehicles, other than those declared by law to be confidential for the use of the division of motor vehicles, shall be open to public inspection during office hours. Any copies or photostatic copies of any records, books, papers, documents, and rulings of the division of motor vehicles when certified to be correct by an employee of the division of motor vehicles who is designated for this purpose by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall be acceptable as evidence in the courts of this state with the same force and effect as the originals, in all cases where such original records, books, papers, documents, and rulings would be admitted in evidence.

Whenever any subpoena duces tecum is issued to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles for the production in court of the records, books, papers, documents, or rulings of the division of motor vehicles it shall not be necessary for the administrator of the division of motor vehicles to whom the subpoena is issued to appear personally, and a copy or photostat duly certified under the seal of the department by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles of the records, books, papers, documents, or rulings of the division of motor vehicles submitted as described in this section shall be full compliance with the subpoena. Under the application to the court and for good cause shown, the court may compel the attendance of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or the supervisor or an assistant who is charged with the care and custody of the official records or any investigator of the division of motor vehicles to answer the subpoena duces tecum.

For the purposes outlined in this section, the person designated by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall be the official “keeper of records” for the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-11

; P.L. 1968, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 133, § 1.

31-2-12.
Destruction of obsolete records.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles may destroy any records of the division of motor vehicles that have been maintained on file for three (3) years which are obsolete and of no further service in carrying out the powers and duties of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-12

.

31-2-13.
Report to tax assessors of vehicles registered.

As soon as practical after January 1 in every year, the division of motor vehicles shall furnish, without charge, to the tax assessors of each city or town in this state, a statement of the motor vehicles registered from that city or town on and after January 1 and through the thirty-first day of December of the previous year and the inclusive dates of their registration within this period.

The provisions of this section shall apply in all respects in the case of taxes assessed upon motor vehicles by any fire district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 7; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2639, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3714, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-13

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 341, § 5.

31-2-14.
Investigation of applications — Rejection.

The division of motor vehicles shall examine and determine the genuineness, regularity, and legality of every application for registration of a vehicle, and for an operator’s or chauffeur’s license and of any other application lawfully made to the division of motor vehicles, and may in all cases make investigation as may be deemed necessary or require additional information, and shall reject any application if not satisfied of the genuineness, regularity, or legality of the application or the truth of any statement contained in it, or for any other reason, when authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-14

.

31-2-15.
Seizure of documents and plates.

The division of motor vehicles is authorized to take possession of any registration card, permit, license, or registration plate issued by it upon expiration, revocation, cancellation, or suspension, or which is fictitious, or which has been unlawfully or erroneously issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-15

.

31-2-16.
Publication of laws.

The division of motor vehicles may publish a synopsis or summary of the laws of this state regulating the operation of vehicles and may deliver a copy of the summary without charge with each original vehicle registration and with each original operator’s or chauffeur’s license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-16

.

31-2-17.
Summons of witnesses — Taking of testimony.

In the performance of their duties under this title, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, or any duly authorized assistant, or hearing officer or officers appointed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, may summon witnesses in behalf of the state and may administer oaths and take testimony.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles, assistant, or hearing officer may also cause depositions to be taken and may order the production of books, papers, agreements, and documents. Failure, without justifiable cause, to appear and testify when summoned in accordance with this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor.

The fees for the attendance and travel of witnesses shall be the same as for witnesses before the district court. The sixth division of the district court shall have jurisdiction in equity upon application of the division of motor vehicles to enforce all lawful orders of the division of motor vehicles under this section. A party aggrieved by an order of the court may appeal the order to the supreme court in accordance with the procedures contained in the rules of appellate procedure of the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-17

; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 12.

31-2-18.
Service of notice.

Whenever, by virtue of §

31-2-17

, notice to any person, firm, or corporation is required, or in any other instance when notice may be required, the notice shall consist of personal delivery to the person, firm, or corporation involved, or by mailing of a registered or certified letter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-18

.

31-2-19.
Appeal from administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

Any person aggrieved by any order of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may appeal the order to the sixth division district court by filing, within ten (10) days from the date of the notice to such person of the issuance of the order appealed from, a petition in said court stating the grounds upon which the appeal is taken. Upon the filing of such petition and tendering a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) filing fee, the court shall give thirty (30) days’ notice of the pendency of the petition to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles by serving the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, in the manner in which subpoenas in equity are served, with a certified copy of the petition and the petition shall follow the course of equity so far as it is applicable. Upon hearing the petition, the court may review the evidence taken at a hearing or investigator’s reports, or other information upon which the administrator’s action was taken, and may in its discretion, affirm, overrule, or modify the order of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The taking of such appeal shall not operate as a stay of the order of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles from which appeal is taken, and such order shall remain in full force and effect during the pendency of the appeal. A party aggrieved by a final order of the court may seek appellate review pursuant to the procedures set forth in §

42-35-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 2, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

31-2-19

; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 12; P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 8; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 10.

31-2-20.
Registration and license information — Fee.

The division of motor vehicles, department of revenue shall, upon request, furnish registration and license information to the public. The division shall collect ten dollars ($10.00) for each request. However, if the request is made by any governmental agency, bureau or department, the division shall collect no fee. All nongovernmental inquiries must be accompanied by a written statement of purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 1, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 3.

31-2-21.
Record of hearings.

In all administrative hearings conducted by personnel of the division of motor vehicles involving the issuance, revocation, or suspension of licenses to operate vehicles or the registration of vehicles, a taped recording of that hearing may be made part of the record. In case of appeal to a court, copies of those tapes in lieu of a transcript shall be made available without charge to the operator, owner, or his or her representative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 18, § 1.

31-2-22.
Authority to enter into reciprocity agreements.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements on behalf of the state with the duly authorized representatives of any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a state or a province of a foreign country, providing for the registration of vehicles on an apportionment or allocation basis. In exercising this authority, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles is expressly authorized to enter into and to become a member of the International Registration Plan, or any other designation that may, from time to time, be given to such a plan. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is further authorized to promulgate and to enforce any rules and regulations that may be necessary to carry out the provisions of the International Registration Plan or any other agreement entered into under authority set forth in this section.

The International Registration Plan, and any other agreement authorized to be entered into by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, shall take precedence over any state law or regulation that may be in conflict with the aforementioned agreements.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 294, § 1.

31-2-23.
Denial of license or registrations for nonpayment of delinquent child support.

The department of human services, child support enforcement shall periodically within each year furnish the division of motor vehicles, department of revenue with a list or compilation of names of individuals, together with such other identifying information and in such form as the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall require, who as of the date of the list or compilation, have an unpaid child support order arrearage in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) as shown on the Rhode Island family court/department of human services, child support enforcement computer system (“CSE system”). For purposes of this section, the terms used in this section shall be given the meaning and definitions specified in §

15-16-2

. The department of human services shall, at times and in the manner prescribed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, furnish to the division of motor vehicles information relating to the subsequent payment of those child support order arrearages by or on behalf of the individuals, and the division shall remove the name of the individual(s) from the list.

No individual whose name appears on the list or compilation referred to in subsection (a) of this section, and whose name has not been subsequently removed from the list, shall be permitted to (1) register or renew a registration of any motor vehicle and/or (2) obtain an original license or renewal of a license to operate a motor vehicle, until all child support order arrearages have been paid in full or a satisfactory arrangement for payment has been made with the family court, and payment has been certified to the division of motor vehicles by the department of human services, child support enforcement.

The identifying information furnished by the department of human services, child support enforcement to the division of motor vehicles shall not include individuals’ social security numbers.

A refusal by the division of motor vehicles to register or renew a registration of any motor vehicle and/or issue an original license or renew a license to operate a motor vehicle is a final determination for purposes of chapter 35 of title 42.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 11; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 11; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 19; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 3.

31-2-24.
Service fees on returned checks.

The division of motor vehicles is authorized to impose a fee on returned checks, which shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per returned check.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 19, § 19.

31-2-25.
Surrender of suspended license.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a licensee whose license has been suspended shall not be required to surrender the license to the division of motor vehicles for the period of suspension. In the event a licensee is found to be operating a motor vehicle while under suspension, the license shall be seized by the proper officer and returned to the division of motor vehicles for the remainder of the suspension period.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 375, § 1.

31-2-26.
Surrender of suspended registration.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a motorist whose registration has been suspended shall not be required to surrender the registration plates to the division of motor vehicles for the period of suspension. In the event a motorist is found to be operating a motor vehicle while the registration is suspended, the registration plates shall be seized by the proper officer and returned to the division of motor vehicles for the remainder of the suspension period.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 375, § 1.

31-2-27.
Technology surcharge fee.

The division of motor vehicles shall collect a technology surcharge fee of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per transaction for every division of motor vehicles’ fee transaction, except as otherwise provided by law and provided no surcharge fee is assessed on motor vehicle inspection transactions conducted pursuant to §

31-38-4

. One dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) of each two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the information technology investment fund established pursuant to §

42-11-2.5

and shall be used for project-related payments and/or ongoing maintenance of and enhancements to the division of motor vehicles’ computer system and to reimburse the information technology investment fund for advances made to cover project-related payments. The remaining one dollar ($1.00) shall be deposited into a restricted-receipt account managed by the division of motor vehicles and restricted to the project-related payments and/or ongoing maintenance of and enhancements to the division of motor vehicles’ computer system.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 7, § 1].

Beginning July 1, 2022, the full two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) shall be deposited into the division of motor vehicles restricted account and restricted to the project-related payments and/or ongoing maintenance of and enhancements to the division of motor vehicles’ computer system.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 7, § 1.

31-2-28.
Expiration dates.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the general or public laws to the contrary, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may extend the expiration date of any permit, license, registration, certificate, placard, or other privilege issued by the division of motor vehicles for a period of up to ninety (90) days when the administrator’s ability to properly perform their duties is prevented, hindered, impaired, or otherwise delayed by:

Any upgrade, replacement, or modification of existing technology systems that requires significant time for implementation;

A disaster, as defined in §

30-15-3

, that has occurred, or the occurrence of which, or the threat thereof, is imminent; or

The occurrence of any other similar event that warrants such extension.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 98, § 1.